tools/hunspell-merge/dictionaries/el_GR.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY άόίϊΐέήύϋΰώιηυωοεατνρσκμπλςγδθφβζξψχΆΈΉΊΌΎΏ

# prefix rules

PFX A Y 1
PFX A   0     α         .       # βάσιμος > αβάσιμος

PFX B Y 1
PFX B   0     ξανα      .       # ζητώ > ξαναζητώ

PFX C Y 1
PFX C   0     απο       .       # σύνθεση > αποσύνθεση

PFX D Y 1
PFX D   0     κατα      .       # στροφή > καταστροφή

PFX E Y 1
PFX E   0     παρα      .       # βλέπω > παραβλέπω


# suffix rules
SFX a Y 3
SFX a ας    α		.
SFX a ας    ες		.
SFX a ας    ων		.

SFX m Y 5
SFX m ώ     άς         .    # αγαπώ > αγαπάς
SFX m ώ     ά          .    # αγαπώ > αγαπά
SFX m ώ     ούμε       .    # αγαπώ > αγαπάς
SFX m ώ     άτε        .    # αγαπώ > αγαπάς
SFX m ώ     ούν        .    # αγαπώ > αγαπάς
